Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120A.20, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Age limitations; pupils. (a) All schools supported in whole or in part by state funds are public schools. Admission to a public school is free to any person who: (1) resides within the district that operates the schoolnew text begin or qualifies under paragraph (d)new text end ; (2) is under 21 years of age or who meets the requirements of paragraph (c); and (3) satisfies the minimum age requirements imposed by this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the conduct of all students under 21 years of age attending a public secondary school is governed by a single set of reasonable rules and regulations promulgated by the school board. (b) A person shall not be admitted to a public school (1) as a kindergarten pupil, unless the pupil is at least five years of age on September 1 of the calendar year in which the school year for which the pupil seeks admission commences; or (2) as a 1st grade student, unless the pupil is at least six years of age on September 1 of the calendar year in which the school year for which the pupil seeks admission commences or has completed kindergarten; except that any school board may establish a policy for admission of selected pupils at an earlier age under section 124D.02. (c) A pupil who becomes age 21 after enrollment is eligible for continued free public school enrollment until at least one of the following occurs: (1) the first September 1 after the pupil's 21st birthday; (2) the pupil's completion of the graduation requirements; (3) the pupil's withdrawal with no subsequent enrollment within 21 calendar days; (4) the end of the school year; or (5) in the case of a student with a disability as defined under section 125A.02, the pupil's 22nd birthday. new text begin (d) A pupil continues to qualify for free public school under paragraph (a), clause (1), if: new text end new text begin (1) the pupil has been continuously enrolled in the school district or charter school for at least one year; new text end new text begin (2) at least one parent of the pupil remains a resident of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (3) the pupil has enrolled in online learning under section 124D.094; new text end new text begin (4) the public school where the pupil is enrolled and the pupil mutually agree on a course of study for the pupil while the pupil is a nonresident; new text end new text begin (5) the pupil participating in online learning is physically absent from the school district for not more than 60 consecutive school days; and new text end new text begin (6) the pupil intends to return to the pupil's school district or charter school after the pupil's physical absence from the state ends. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Pupil unit. Pupil units for each Minnesota resident pupil under the age of 21 or who meets the requirements of section 120A.20, subdivision 1, paragraph (c)new text begin or (d)new text end , in average daily membership enrolled in the district of residence, in another district under sections 123A.05 to 123A.08, 124D.03, 124D.08, or 124D.68; in a charter school under chapter 124E; or for whom the resident district pays tuition under sections 123A.18, 123A.22, 123A.30, 123A.32, 123A.44, 123A.488, 123B.88, subdivision 4, 124D.04, 124D.05, 125A.03 to 125A.24, 125A.51, or 125A.65, shall be counted according to this subdivision. (a) A prekindergarten pupil with a disability who is enrolled in a program approved by the commissioner and has an individualized education program is counted as the ratio of the number of hours of assessment and education service to 825 times 1.0 with a minimum average daily membership of 0.28, but not more than 1.0 pupil unit. (b) A prekindergarten pupil who is assessed but determined not to be disabled is counted as the ratio of the number of hours of assessment service to 825 times 1.0. (c) A prekindergarten pupil who is not included in paragraph (a) or (b) and is enrolled in an approved voluntary prekindergarten program under section 142D.08 is counted as the ratio of the number of hours of instruction to 850 times 1.0, but not more than 0.6 pupil units. (d) A kindergarten pupil is counted as 1.0 pupil unit if the pupil is enrolled in a free all-day, every day kindergarten program available to all kindergarten pupils at the pupil's school that meets the minimum hours requirement in section 120A.41, or is counted as .55 pupil unit, if the pupil is not enrolled in a free all-day, every day kindergarten program available to all kindergarten pupils at the pupil's school. (e) A pupil who is in any of grades 1 to 6 is counted as 1.0 pupil unit. (f) A pupil who is in any of grades 7 to 12 is counted as 1.2 pupil units. (g) A pupil who is in the postsecondary enrollment options program is counted as 1.2 pupil units. (h) A prekindergarten pupil who: (1) is not included in paragraph (a), (b), or (c); (2) is enrolled in a school readiness plus program under section 142D.07; and (3) has one or more of the risk factors specified by the eligibility requirements for a school readiness plus program, is counted as the ratio of the number of hours of instruction to 850 times 1.0, but not more than 0.6 pupil units. A pupil qualifying under this paragraph must be counted in the same manner as a voluntary prekindergarten student for all general education and other school funding formulas. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STATE AID FOR ADDITIONAL ONLINE PUPILS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Additional state aid. new text end new text begin For additional state aid for general education revenue and other education programs: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end